District of Columbia statutes.
2-503

Establishment of procedures.

(a)

The Mayor and the Council shall, for the Mayor and for each subordinate agency, establish or require each subordinate agency to establish procedures in accordance with this subchapter.

(b)

Each independent agency shall establish procedures in accordance with this subchapter.

(c)

The procedures required to be established by subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall include requirements of practice before the Mayor and each agency.

Oct. 21, 1968, 82 Stat. 1205, Pub. L. 90-614, § 4
Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-19, title I, § 102(r), (s), 22 DCR 2051
Mar. 25, 1977, D.C. Law 1-96, § 3(a), (c), 23 DCR 9532b

History

1981 Ed., § 1-1503.
1973 Ed., § 1-1503.

Prior Codifications